Mississippi statutes. Title 25. Public Officers and Employees; Public Records
In General

§ 25-58-1.
Definitions; boards of supervisors authorized to create geographic information system and prepare multipurpose cadastre.

For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Geographic information system” means a computerized, spatial coordinate mapping and relational data base technology which (i) captures, assembles, stores, converts, manages, analyzes, amalgamates and records, in the digital mode, all kinds and types of information and data; (ii) transforms such information and data into intelligence; and subsequently (iii) retrieves, presents and distributes that intelligence to a user for use in making the intelligent decisions necessary for sound management of private or political affairs.

“Data base” means a collection of available information and data assembled into electronic files for efficient and timely management of county and municipal affairs and functions and the exercise of the powers, duties and responsibilities placed upon the governing authorities of a county or municipality by Mississippi law and the Mississippi Constitution.

“Multipurpose cadastre” means a uniformly accepted base map registered to the Mississippi State Plane Coordinate System and depicting boundaries of all public properties.

“Mississippi State Plane Coordinate System” means the system of plane rectangular coordinates established by the National Geodetic Survey which system is further identified as North American Datum (NAD) 1983.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to do all things necessary and desirable to create a geographic information system for the county or municipality, as appropriate. Data bases for such a system shall be created under the direct supervision of persons who are experienced in and possess a demonstrated knowledge of the preparation of geographic information systems and of the data bases and the other requirements and activities related thereto.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality are further authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to prepare, or have prepared, a multipurpose cadastre registered to the accuracy standards promulgated by the Federal Geodetic Control Committee established under the provisions of the United States Office of Management and Budget Memoranda A-16.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 555, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 426, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.

§ 25-58-3.
Borrowing money to create geographic information system and to prepare multipurpose cadastre.

The board of supervisors of any county and the governing authorities of any municipality (both referred to in this section as “governing authority”) are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to borrow money, pursuant to the provisions of this section to create the geographic information system and prepare the multipurpose cadastre authorized in Section 25-58-1.

Before any money is borrowed under the provisions of this section, the governing authority shall adopt a resolution declaring the necessity for such borrowing and specifying the purpose for which the money borrowed is to be expended, the amount to be borrowed, the date or dates of the maturity thereof, and how such indebtedness is to be evidenced. The resolution shall be certified over the signature of the head of the governing authority.

The borrowing shall be evidenced by negotiable notes or certificates of indebtedness of the governing authority which shall be signed by the principal officer and clerk of such governing authority. All such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be offered at public sale by the governing authority after not less than ten (10) days’ advertising in a newspaper having general circulation within the governing authority. Each sale shall be made to the bidder offering the lowest rate of interest or whose bid represents the lowest net cost to the governing authority; however, the rate of interest shall not exceed that now or hereafter authorized in Section 75-17-101, Mississippi Code of 1972. No such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be issued and sold for less than par and accrued interest. All notes or certificates of indebtedness shall mature in approximately equal installments of principal and interest over a period not to exceed ten (10) years from the dates of the issuance thereof. Principal shall be payable annually, and interest shall be payable annually or semiannually; provided, however, that the first payment of principal or interest may be for any period not exceeding one (1) year. Provided, however, if negotiable notes are outstanding from not more than one (1) previous issue authorized under the provisions of this section, then the schedule of payments for a new or supplementary issue may be so adjusted that the schedule of maturities of all notes or series of notes hereunder shall, when combined, mature in approximately equal installments of principal and interest over a period of ten (10) years from the date of the new or supplementary issue, or if a lower interest rate will thereby be secured on notes previously issued and outstanding, a portion of the proceeds of any issue authorized hereunder may be used to refund the balance of the indebtedness previously issued under the authority of this article. Such notes or certificates of indebtedness shall be issued in such form and in such denominations as may be determined by the governing authority and may be made payable at the office of any bank or trust company selected by the governing authority. In such case, funds for the payment of principal and interest due thereon shall be provided in the same manner provided by law for the payment of the principal and interest due on bonds issued by the governing authority.

For the prompt payment of notes or certificates of indebtedness at maturity, both principal and interest, the full faith, credit and resources of the issuing entity are pledged. Furthermore, the governing authority may annually levy a special tax in an amount not to exceed three (3) mills upon all of its taxable property, the avails of which shall be paid into a sinking fund and used exclusively for the payment of principal of and interest on the notes or certificates of indebtedness. Until needed for expenditure, monies in the sinking fund may be invested in the same manner as the governing authority is elsewhere authorized by law to invest surplus funds.

The proceeds of any notes or certificates of indebtedness issued under the provisions of this section shall be placed in a special fund and shall be expended only for the purpose or purposes for which they were issued as shown by the resolution authorizing the issuance thereof. If a balance shall remain of the proceeds of such notes or certificates of indebtedness after the purpose or purposes for which they were issued shall have been accomplished, such balance shall be used to pay such obligations at or before maturity and may be transferred to any sinking fund previously established for the payment thereof.

Proceeds from the sale of notes or certificates of indebtedness not immediately necessary for expenditure shall be invested in the same manner as surplus funds of the governing authority may be invested.

Regardless of the method of paying for the creation of a geographic information system or for the preparation of a multipurpose cadastre, and notwithstanding anything in the Mississippi Public Records Act Section 25-61-1 et seq., to the contrary, a county or municipality which has created or acquired a geographic information system or prepared a multipurpose cadastre may assess a fee or charge in accordance with the provisions of Section 25-61-7(2). However, all fees shall be subject to a standard scale adopted by the governing authority. If the governing authority has issued notes or certificates of indebtedness, any fees shall be deposited into the sinking fund and used exclusively for payment of principal and interest on the notes or certificates of indebtedness until paid in full. Thereafter, the fees shall be deposited into the county’s or municipality’s general fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1990, ch. 555, § 2; Laws, 1999, ch. 466, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1999.